Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0400.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406ww. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall not require a prior authorization for coverage of a medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder or alcohol use disorder. As used in this section, "prior authorization" means that term as defined in section 2212e.